Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-2] Territorial application;
jurisdiction of courts; form of procedure. (a) This chapter shall apply
to the United States, the states and territories, the District of Columbia, and
all territories subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, and to
proceedings commenced in any court therein, and shall be enforced through the
usual forms of procedure in such courts or under their rules.

(b) When under this chapter any application is
required to be made to a court in which no proceeding has already been
commenced as to the matter, that application may be made to any court. [L 1994,
c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next